North Carolina statutes. Chapter 80. Trademarks, Brands, etc.
ARTICLE 4.
Farm Names.

§§ 80-33 through 80-37: Repealed by Session Laws 2012-18, s. 1.12, effective July 1, 2012.

(§ 80-33: 1915, c. 108, s. 1; C.S., s. 4004; repealed by 2012-18, s. 1.12; § 80-34: 1915, c. 108, s. 1; C.S., s. 4005; repealed by 2012-18, s. 1.12; § 80-35: 1915, c. 108, s. 1; C.S., s. 4006; repealed by 2012-18, s. 1.12; § 80-36: 1915, c. 108, s. 1; C.S., s. 4007; repealed by 2012-18, s. 1.12; § 80-37: 1915, c. 108, s. 1; C.S., s. 4008.)

Editor's Note.

- Former

G.S. 80-33

through 80-37 pertained to registration of farm names and registry procedures.

§ 80-38. When transfer of farm carries name.

When any owner of a farm, the name of which has been recorded in the office of the register of deeds of the county in which the farm is located according to the law in effect at the time of recording, transfers by deed or otherwise the whole of such farm, such transfer may include the registered name thereof; but if the owner shall transfer only a portion of such farm, then, in the event, the registered name thereof shall not be transferred to the purchaser unless so stated in the deed or conveyance.

(1915, c. 108, s. 4; C.S., s. 4009; 2012-18, s. 1.13.)

Effect of Amendments.

- Session Laws 2012-18, s. 1.13, effective July 1, 2012, substituted "in the office of the register of deeds of the county in which the farm is located according to the law in effect at the time of recording" for "as provided in this Article."

§ 80-39. Cancellation of registry; fee.

When any owner of a farm name that has been registered in the office of the register of deeds of the county in which the farm is located desires to cancel the registered name thereof, such owner may record a duly signed and acknowledged instrument to that effect in the register of deeds real estate records.

(1915, c. 108, s. 5; C.S., s. 4010; 2012-18, s. 1.14.)

Effect of Amendments.

- Session Laws 2012-18, s. 1.14, effective July 1, 2012, rewrote the section.